Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7920.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 5-33.2-13 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-33.2 entitled "Funeral
Director/Embalmer and Funeral Service Establishments" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-33.2-13. Funeral establishment and branch officer — Crematories — Inspections
— Denial of access.
(a) Any licensed funeral director/embalmer employed, authorized, and empowered by the
division of professional regulation may enter any funeral establishment, funeral-establishment
branch office, or crematory licensed under the provisions of this chapter, during the hours the
funeral establishment, funeral-establishment branch office, or crematory is open for business, for
the purpose of inspecting the sanitary conditions, complaint investigations, and ascertaining if the
provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations are being observed in the operation of the
funeral establishment, funeral-establishment branch office, or crematory. The inspector may
request permission from the department to be accompanied by another employee of the department
of health prior to an inspection. Failure or refusal of the person in charge of that funeral
establishment, funeral-establishment branch office, or crematory to permit the inspection at all
reasonable times shall be deemed sufficient cause for the revocation of any license issued to the
funeral establishment, funeral-establishment branch office, or crematory and any certificate of
approval issued by the division.
(b) Funeral establishments and branch offices and crematories licensed under the

provisions of this chapter shall be inspected at least twice once each year. Inspections shall include
all areas of sanitation and public health, complaint investigations, as well as conformity with
applicable section of this chapter and the rules and regulations.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005255/SUB A
========
LC005255/SUB A - Page 2 of 3